Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [174.77] INVENTORY OF PEDESTRIAN CROSSINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of sections 174.77 and 174.78, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Americans with Disabilities Act" or "ADA" means the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, United States Code, title 42, sections 12101 to 12117. new text end new text begin (c) "City" means a statutory or home rule charter city. new text end new text begin (d) "Eligible recipient" means a road authority, as defined in section 160.02, subdivision 25. new text end new text begin (e) "Pedestrian crossing point" means the portion of a curb on a public roadway adjacent to a crosswalk, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 20. new text end new text begin (f) "Noncompliant crossing" means a pedestrian crossing point that is not in compliance with current ADA requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Statewide pedestrian crossing inventory. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of transportation must establish a program to inventory every pedestrian crossing point in the state to determine compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must adopt rules consistent with this section that establish a process to: new text end new text begin (1) compile all existing ADA transition plan inventories from cities, counties, towns, the Metropolitan Council, and the department; new text end new text begin (2) categorize each pedestrian crossing point as fully compliant, partially compliant, noncompliant, or requiring inspection; new text end new text begin (3) work with local entities to inspect any pedestrian crossing point that requires inspection; new text end new text begin (4) identify pedestrian crossing points for inspection by the department; new text end new text begin (5) provide an expedited process for a city, town, or county to apply for and receive a grant to inspect pedestrian crossing points; and new text end new text begin (6) prioritize and disburse grants to eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (c) In establishing criteria for awarding grants under this section, the commissioner must prioritize eligible recipients: new text end new text begin (1) with populations under 5,000; new text end new text begin (2) with a relatively high percentage of pedestrian crossing points that require inspection; and new text end new text begin (3) that are targeting areas for inspection that include lower-income residents and other disadvantaged communities. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must maintain a database that tracks the compliance status of pedestrian crossing points across the state. The commissioner must make the database accessible to the public on the department website. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin An eligible recipient may use a grant provided under this program to: new text end new text begin (1) conduct an expedited survey of pedestrian crossing points that require inspection within the recipient's jurisdiction to determine compliance; new text end new text begin (2) contract with a third party to perform the work described in clause (1); and new text end new text begin (3) repay debt incurred for the purposes described in clauses (1) and (2). new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [174.78] ACCESSIBLE PEDESTRIAN CROSSINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of transportation must establish a program to bring every pedestrian crossing point in the state into compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act by December 31, 2035. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must adopt rules consistent with this section that establish a process to: new text end new text begin (1) determine whether modifications to each noncompliant crossing will be performed by regional master contract, as described in subdivision 4, or directly by the department or a local road authority; new text end new text begin (2) request proposals for regional, multiyear contracts to perform the work required by the program; and new text end new text begin (3) provide grants to eligible recipients to perform necessary modifications to noncompliant crossings. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin (a) An eligible recipient may use a grant provided under this program: new text end new text begin (1) to design, construct, and fully scope the work required to bring noncompliant crossings in its jurisdiction into compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act; or new text end new text begin (2) to repay debt incurred for the purposes described in clause (1). new text end new text begin (b) A grant received under this section must not be used to contract with a third party to perform the work described in paragraph (a), clause (1), except that the commissioner may permit an eligible entity to use a grant provided under this program to expand the scope of an existing project to include modifications to a noncompliant crossing. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Planning and prioritization. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish a process to determine whether the work required to bring each noncompliant crossing into compliance will be performed by the local road authority or as part of a regional multiyear master contract. The commissioner must coordinate with local road authorities to make this determination. new text end new text begin (b) Within each region or jurisdiction, the commissioner must prioritize work on noncompliant crossings that are in close proximity to: new text end new text begin (1) transit routes; new text end new text begin (2) school zones; new text end new text begin (3) senior housing; new text end new text begin (4) areas with high pedestrian-vehicle conflict; and new text end new text begin (5) areas with a high concentration of residents with disabilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Regional projects. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish a process to request proposals for regional multiyear contracts to perform the work required under this section. A contract under this subdivision is a regional master contract. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must divide the state into regions that align with department districts. A district may have multiple regions. new text end new text begin (c) A request for proposals under this subdivision must be issued for each region identified under paragraph (b) and must be designed to maximize efficient work and use of resources, including by: new text end new text begin (1) using standardized design templates and materials; new text end new text begin (2) addressing a minimum number of noncompliant crossings with each deployment; new text end new text begin (3) permitting performance over multiple years; and new text end new text begin (4) clustering work to reduce costs. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must provide a local road authority with the option to include some or all of its noncompliant crossings in a regional master contract that encompasses the local road authority's jurisdiction. The process required under this subdivision must provide guidance for local road authorities that intend to participate, including: new text end new text begin (1) relevant deadlines to participate in a regional master contract; and new text end new text begin (2) any cost participation requirements. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must reduce costs for a city or town with a population under 5,000 by eliminating any cost participation requirement for a project required under this section. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner must reduce costs for a city or town with a population between 5,000 and 10,000 by reducing cost participation requirements for a project required under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Public sector road authority projects. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish a process to provide a grant to an eligible entity that uses its own maintenance capacity to perform some or all of the work required under this section within the eligible entity's jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (b) To participate in the program under this subdivision, an eligible entity must have maintenance capacity to perform the work on noncompliant crossings required under this section by December 31, 2035. new text end new text begin (c) A local road authority may participate in the program under this subdivision and subdivisions 4 and 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Existing projects. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish a process to provide a grant to a local road authority to expand the scope of an existing project to perform the work required under this section on a noncompliant crossing when a project expansion would be more efficient than performing the work under subdivision 4 or 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Workforce plan. new text end new text begin Any contractor bidding for a regional contract must submit a workforce plan as part of the contractor's application. The workforce plan must include a description of how the applicant will maximize the use of registered apprentices and other steps the applicant will take to develop a sustainable workforce in the region covered by the contract. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Prevailing wage. new text end new text begin Laborers and mechanics performing work on a project funded by a grant under this section must be paid the prevailing wage rate for the work as defined in section 177.42, subdivision 6. Projects under this section are subject to the requirements and enforcement provisions under sections 177.27, 177.30, 177.32, 177.41 to 177.435, and 177.45. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Accountability and reporting. new text end new text begin By September 15 each year, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance on the operation of the program during the previous fiscal year. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an estimate of the total cost to bring all pedestrian crossing points into compliance with the ADA, by region, and a computation of the amount the estimate changed since the program was created. If the cost estimate changed since the most recent previous report was submitted, the report must include an explanation of the reasons the estimate changed; new text end new text begin (2) the number of noncompliant crossings that the commissioner has identified; new text end new text begin (3) the number of pedestrian crossing points that require inspection in each region; new text end new text begin (4) the number of pedestrian crossing points brought into compliance in the last year and whether the work was performed under subdivision 4, 5, or 6; new text end new text begin (5) the average cost to bring a noncompliant crossing into compliance, reported statewide, by region, and by approach; new text end new text begin (6) the status of any requests for proposals or master contracts in effect in each region, including the contract cost, how many noncompliant crossings will be serviced under the contract, whether any local road authorities are participating in the contract, and the time period for performance of the contract; new text end new text begin (7) any amounts appropriated for the grant program that remain unspent; new text end new text begin (8) a list of the eligible recipients that submitted an application under this section or section 174.77; and new text end new text begin (9) a list of the eligible recipients that received a grant under this section or section 174.77. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation to provide pedestrian crossing inventory grants to eligible recipients under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.77. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin BOND APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $....... is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation for grants for accessible pedestrian crossing points under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.78. This appropriation may be used for regional master contracts and for grants to eligible recipients. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $....... in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end